Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 3

Reimbursement of Health Care Provider Costs

12-4-301. Establishment of rules and regulations for determining payment.

It is hereby made the duty of the commissioner of health, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, to establish rules and regulations for the determination of payment to the contracting health care providers who contract with the several state agencies for the care of persons.

This part shall not apply to health care providers, for purposes of payment to such health care providers pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, except as expressly provided by rules and regulations promulgated by the department of health pursuant to § 71-5-105; provided, that this part shall not apply to payments made pursuant to title 8, chapter 27.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-425; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 14, provided “Rules and regulations of the comptroller and other departments of state government affected by this act shall remain in effect until subsequently repealed. Rules and regulations promulgated hereunder may be initially promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208).”

Cross-References. Prompt payment for property and services, title 12, ch. 4, part 7.

12-4-302. Determination of payment.

For the purposes herein set out, payment shall be determined by the comptroller of the treasury in accordance with the rules and regulations established by the department of health pursuant to §12-4-301, in consultation with the several state departments and agencies contracting with health care providers for services and the Tennessee Hospital Association.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 2; 1963, ch. 289, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-426; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 2.

12-4-303. Eligibility to receive payment.

To be eligible to receive payment, the contracting health care providers shall use uniform statistics and classification of accounts as published by the American Hospital Association for all accounting records, or any other acceptable accounting methods approved by the department of health, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Hospital Association.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-427; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 3.

Cross-References. Medical assistance, payments to vendors, §71-5-130.

12-4-304. Penalty for improper accounting.

For the purpose of this part, any contracting provider that does not adopt the uniform classification of accounts, or other acceptable accounting methods as shall be established by the department of health, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the Tennessee Hospital Association, or does not submit cost data as required by the department, shall be assessed a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day such provider is not in compliance with this section.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-428; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 4; 1988, ch. 779, § 1.

Cross-References. Medical assistance, payments to vendors, §71-5-130.

12-4-305. Certification of figures — Noncertified statements.

The department of health, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, may require that figures submitted by the health care provider be certified by the administrator of the provider and by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant. The final authority for the determination and certification of figures submitted by the provider to the department shall be the comptroller of the treasury; provided, that any provider that does not submit certified statements, when required, shall be assessed the penalty provided by §12-4-304.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 5; 1974, ch. 487, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-429; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 5; 1988, ch. 779, § 2.

12-4-306. Forms for reports and statements.

All forms for reporting figures by health care providers shall be designed and specified by the department of health, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and the state departments purchasing health care services and the Tennessee Hospital Association. All providers shall be required to submit statements on the form or forms prescribed and designed by the department for this purpose.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 6; T.C.A., § 12-430; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 6.

12-4-307. Audits.

The comptroller of the treasury is empowered and has the right and privilege to audit any contracting health care provider to verify statements and data submitted by the provider; provided, that all legal aids granted to the comptroller of the treasury elsewhere, by law, are expressly reserved to the comptroller of the treasury in such audits.

Acts 1961, ch. 117, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-431; Acts 1984, ch. 787, § 7.

12-4-308. Reimbursement of licensed residential homes for mentally ill.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall, by rule, establish a pilot program to reimburse licensed supportive living facilities for the mentally ill, as defined by departmental rules, in those counties having a population according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent such census of:

not less than nor more than

23,850 23,900

26,400 26,500

32,600 32,700

32,760 32,800

34,600 34,700

56,000 56,100

74,500 74,600

287,700 287,800

319,625 319,725

400,000 500,000

770,000 780,000

The rules may, in the discretion of the department, distinguish between the types of facilities and between beds within a facility to implement the pilot program, the cost of which shall not exceed the amount provided for such purpose in the general appropriations act.

The department shall reimburse licensed supportive living facilities for the mentally ill in a daily or monthly amount to be established by the department for each resident whose income is limited to payments under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), and does not exceed the monthly SSI federal benefit rate (FBR). No supportive living facility participating in the pilot program shall receive reimbursement under the pilot program for more than thirty percent (30%) of its licensed residential capacity. If necessary to implement this program within the limits of its annual appropriation, the department may promulgate rules to further limit the number of residents for whom reimbursement may be claimed.

For the period beginning January 1, 2006, and until May 4, 2006, only, any payments withheld due to a resident's income exceeding the six-hundred-dollar per month limit shall be paid in accordance with subdivision (b)(1).

This section shall have no application unless funding is specifically provided for and included in the general appropriations bill. During any fiscal year, departmental reimbursement paid to licensed supportive living facilities under the authority of subsection (b) shall not exceed the level of funding specifically provided for such purpose within the general appropriations bill.

The implementation of this section and the expenditure of any funds to implement such provisions shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.

The department is authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, such rules as may be necessary to effectively and efficiently implement this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 937, § 1; 1989, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 870, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 869, § 1; 1996, ch. 875, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2006, ch. 619, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 23; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 14; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; T.C.A. §12-4-330.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e), concerning evaluation and review of the effectiveness and utilization of the pilot program to reimburse licensed supportive living facilities for the mentally ill, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission.

The intention of Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 14, effective May 27, 2011, was to create an exception to Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 3, which purported to substitute “chief procurement officer” for “commissioner of finance and administration” in (c)(2), to become effective October 1, 2011, so that this change would not be made in this code section.

This section was renumbered from §12-4-330 to §12-4-308 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

The federal benefit rate, referred to in this section, is compiled under Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.